chv.twol
"No yots before yotised vowels and string final"
%{й%}:0 <=> Vow _ %>: [ :Cns | :0 ]* :YotisedVow ;  
              н _ ( :0) %>: %{и%}: ; 
          Cns ь _ :YotisedVow ;
                _ :YotisedVow (%{в%}: ) %>: ; 
                _ ( :YotisedVow) [ :0 ]* .#. ;
                _ %>: %{Ă%}: н ; ! genitive
                _ %>: ш  ; ! ter, ins
                _ :YotisedVow [ :0 ]* %>:  ;
                _ :YotisedVow %{в%}: ; ! менювӗ
       except 
                _ %>: %{U%}:ӳ ; 
                и _ %>: %{Ĕ%}: ; 

!@ м е н {й}:0 ю {в}:0 {☭}:0 >:0 п {A}:а

!@ ш ӑ ш и {й}:й >:0 {U}:ӳ {н}:0

!@ и н ф о р м а ц и {й}:0 >:0 {N}:0 {A}:е

!@ н я н {й}:0 я:0 >:0 {и}:и {н}:н >:0 {N}:0 {A}:е

!@ т у х ь {й}:0 я >:0 {T}:р {A}:а

!@ н я н {й}:ь я:ӑ >:0 с е {м}:м
 
"Forbid i kratka following н"
%{й%}:ь <=> н _  [ я:ӑ | ю:ӑ ] ; ! \:YotisedVow ; 

!@ н я н {й}:ь я:ӑ >:0 {N}:н {A}:а

"Vowel reduction for yotised consonants"
Vx:ӑ <=> %{й%}: _ (%{в%}: ) %>: %{N%}: %{A%}: ;  ! dative
         %{й%}: _ %{в%}: %>: %{и%}:  ; ! possessive 
         %{й%}: _  %>: с  ;  ! plural
         %{й%}: _  %>: п  ;  ! instrumental 
         %{й%}: _  %>: %{T%}:  ;  ! locative
         %{й%}: _  %>: ш  ;  ! term.
         %{й%}: _ (%{в%}: ) %>: %{Ă%}:  ;  ! genitive
         %{й%}: _ (%{в%}: ) %>: %{ă%}:  ;  ! px1sg
         %{й%}: _ %{в%}: %>: %{U%}:  ;  ! px2sg
         %{й%}: _ %{в%}: %>: %{Ĕ%}:  ;  ! px2pl
     except 
         _ [ :0 - й: ]* %>: %{U%}: ; ! px2sg yotised
         _ [ :0 ]* %>: %{Ĕ%}: р ; ! px yotised
     where Vx in ( я ю ) ; 

!@ с т и х и {й}:й я:ӑ >:0 {T}:р {A}:а н

!@ х ӑ {й}:й ю:ӑ {в}:в >:0 {ă}:ӑ м

!@ х ӑ {й}:й ю:ӑ {в}:в >:0 {Ă}:ӑ н

!@ х ӑ {й}:0 ю:ӑ {в}:в >:0 {и}:0 {н}:н >:0 {N}:0 {A}:е

!@ а л л е {й}:й я:ӑ >:0 {N}:н {A}:а

!@ в л а ҫ >:0 {N}:0 {A}:а

!@ т у х ь {й}: я > {N}:н {A}:а

!@ х ӑ {й}:й ю:ӑ {в}:в >:0 {Ĕ}:ӑ р >:0 с е {м}:м >:0 ш {Ă}:ӗ н

"Possessive {и} does not appear after consonants in dative"
%{и%}:0 <=> :Cns [ :0 - [ UnderBack: | UnderFront: | Vow:0 ] ]* %>: _ ; 
                                                         :Cns ь %>: _ ; 
                                                       и %{й%}: %>: _ ;
        except
                                                     _ %{н%}: %>: %{T%}: ; 
                                          %{ː%}: %>: _ ;
                                                     _ %{н%}: %>: [ ш | п ] ; ! term.,ins
                                                     _ %{н%}: %>: %{Ă%}: ; ! gen.
                                                     _ %{н%}: %>: с ; ! plur.
                                                     _ %{н%}: .#. ; ! nom.
                                   %{в%}: %{☭%}: %>: _ ;

!@ и ю л ь >:0 {и}:0 {н}:н >:0 {N}:0 {A}:е

!@ р а д и о {в}:в {☭}:0 >:0 {и}:ӗ {н}:н >:0 {N}:0 {A}:е

!@ а в т а н >:0 {и}:ӗ {н}:0 >:0 ш {Ă}:ӗ н

!@ у р а м >:0 {и}:ӗ {н}:0 >:0 п {A}:е

"Possessive {и} appears after deleted stem vowels"
%{и%}:и <=> [ UnderBack: | UnderFront: | Vow:0 ] %>: _ ; 
                                          %{ː%}: %>: _ ;

!@ й ӗ п {ː}:п >:0 {и}:и {н}:н >:0 {N}:0 {A}:е

"Possessive deletes full stem vowels"
Vx:0 <=> _ %>: %{и%}: ; 
!         _ %>: %{Ĕ%}: ; 
     where Vx in ( е о а ӑ ӗ я ) ;

!@ к ӗ н е к е:0 >:0 {и}:и {н}:н >:0 {N}:0 {A}:е

"Possessive {н} surfaces after consonants"
%{н%}:н <=> [ :Cns | Cns ь ] [ :0 ]* %>: %{и%}: _ ; 
                            и %{й%}: %>: %{и%}: _ ;
                                     %>: %{U%}: _ %>: %{T%}: ;
        except
            _ %>: [ ш | п ] ; ! term./ins.
            _ %>: %{Ă%}: н ; ! gen
            _ %>: с ; ! pl.
            _ .#. ; 

!@ и н ф о р м а ц и {й}:0 >:0 {и}:0 {н}:н >:0 {N}:0 {A}:е

!@ ш ӑ ш и {й}:0 >:0 {и}:0 {н}:н >:0 {N}:0 {A}:е

!@ ш о с с е:0 >:0 {и}:и {н}:0 >:0 ш {Ă}:ӗ н

!@ ӗ ҫ > {и}:ӗ {н}:0 >:0 {Ă}:0 н
 
"Palatalisation of {T} after {н}"
Cx:ч <=> [ %{н%}:н | %{м%}:н ]  %>: _ ; 
     except 
            %{U%}: %{н%}: %>: _ ; 
     where Cx in ( р %{T%} ) ;

"{T} after liquids and nasals"
%{T%}:т <=> [ р | н ] [ ь: | :0 - %{ː%}:0 ]* %>: _ ; 
                              %{U%}: %{н%}:н %>: _ ;
            л (ь: ) %>: _ ;  

!@ х ӗ в е л >:0 {T}:т {A}:е н

"Forbid double р across morpheme boundary"
р:р /<= _ %>: р ; 

!¬ к о н т р о л ё р >:0 р {A}:а 

!@ к л а с с:0 >:0 {и}:ӗ {н}:н >:0 {T}:ч {A}:е

"Palatalisation of stem final -/t/ in possessive"
Cx:ч <=> \Cx _ (ь: ) [ :0 ]* %>: %{и%}:ӗ ;        ! doesn't apply when duplicated
     where Cx in ( т д ) ; 

"Realisation of plural {м}"
%{м%}:м <=> _ .#. ;           ! Nominative
            _ %>: [ п | ш ] ; ! Instrumental, Terminative

"Realisation of plural {м} as oblique"
%{м%}:н <=> _ %>: %{T%}: ;

!@ ч ӗ р ӗ п >:0 с е {м}:н >:0 {T}:ч {A}:е

"Orthographic detail for и with иу to ю"
и:0 <=> _ о: %{в%}: %{☭%}: %>: %{U%}: ; 

"Orthographic detail for о with иу to ю"
о:ю <=> и: _ %{в%}: %{☭%}: %>: %{U%}: ; 

!@ р а д и:0 о:ю {в}:0 {☭}:0 >:0 {U}:0 {н}:0

!@ р а д и о {в}:в {☭}:0 >:0 {и}:ӗ {н}:0 >:0 с е {м}:0 >:0 {Ă}:0 н

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!	тухья<n><dat>	тухь{й}я>{N}{A}	тухьяна	тухьйӑна	тухьяна
!!	тухья<n><px3sp><dat>	тухь{й}я>{и}{н}>{N}{A}	тухйине	тухьйине	тухйине
!!	утӑ<n><px3sp><dat>	ут{ː}ӑ>{и}{н}>{N}{A}	утине	уттине	утине
!!	аллея<n><loc>	алле{й}я>{T}{A}	аллейӑра	аллеяра	аллейӑра
!!	няня<n><loc>	нян{й}я>{T}{A}	няньӑра	няняра	няньӑра
!!	стихия<n><loc>	стихи{й}я>{T}{A}	стихийӑра	стихияра	стихийӑра
!!	утӑ<n><px3sp><loc>	ут{ː}ӑ>{и}{н}>{T}{A}	утинче	уттинче	утинче
!!	информаци<n><px3sp><loc>	информаци{й}>{и}{н}>{T}{A}	информацинче	информацийӗнче	информацинче
!!	стихия<n><pl><nom>	стихи{й}я>се{м}	стихисем	стихийӑсем	стихисем
!!	тухья<n><pl><nom>	тухь{й}я>се{м}	тухьясем	тухйӑсем	тухьясем
!!	тухья<n><ins>	тухь{й}я>п{A}	тухьяпа	тухйӑпа	тухьяпа
!!	музей<n><gen>	музей>{Ă}н	музейӑн	музейӗн	музейӑн
!!	тухья<n><gen>	тухь{й}я>{Ă}н	тухьян	тухйӑн	тухьян
!!	тухья<n><ter>	тухь{й}я>ш{Ă}н	тухьяшӑн	тухйӑшӑн	тухьяшӑн
!!	утӑ<n><px3sp><ter>	ут{ː}ӑ>{и}{н}>ш{Ă}н	утишӗн	уттишӗн	утишӗн
!!	платье<n><px1sg><nom>	плать{е}>{ă}м	платьем	платьӗм	платьем
!!	тухья<n><px1sg><nom>	тухь{й}я>{ă}м	тухьям	тухйӑм	тухьям
!!	стихия<n><px2pl><nom>	стихи{й}я>{Ĕ}р	стихир	стихийӑр	стихир
!!	хӑю<n><px2pl><nom>	хӑ{й}ю{в}>{Ĕ}р	хӑйӑвӑр	хӑювӑр	хӑйӑвӑр
